Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7617
Act; applicability.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the Multiple Employer Welfare Arrangement Act shall apply to multiple employer welfare arrangements offering health benefit plans on or after July 20, 2002.

(2) The Multiple Employer Welfare Arrangement Act shall apply to multiple employer welfare arrangements providing health care coverage to self-employed individuals on or after January 1, 2020.

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 17;

Laws 2020, LB1014, § 9.